src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_22VAEHAEKENE !!= @CODE@ vähäkene:vähäke
! Gradation: No
:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_22VAEHAEKENE-SG ;
        N_22VAEHAEKENE_PL ;
LEXICON N_22VAEHAEKENE-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_22VWROKWNW/VAEHAEKENE-SG ;
LEXICON N_22VAEHAEKENE_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_22VWROKWNW/VAEHAEKENE_PL ;

LEXICON N_23NUUL1 !!= * @CODE@ nuuĺ:n%{ou%}%{ou%}l
! Gradation: No
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^VOWRaise%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_23NUUL1-SG ;
 N_23NUUL1_PL ;
LEXICON N_23NUUL1-SG
:%{back%} NMN_23NUUL1/KIIL1-SG ;
LEXICON N_23NUUL1_PL
:%{back%} NMN_23NUUL1/KIIL1_PL ;

LEXICON N_23SUUR1 !!= * @CODE@ suuŕ:suur
! Gradation: No
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_23SUUR1-SG ;
 N_23SUUR1_PL ;
LEXICON N_23SUUR1-SG
:%{back%} NMN_23SUUR1-SG ;
LEXICON N_23SUUR1_PL
:%{back%} NMN_23SUUR1_PL ;


LEXICON N_23KIIL1  !!= * @CODE@ kiiĺ:keel
! Gradation: No
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^VOWRaise%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_23KIIL1-SG ;
 N_23KIIL1_PL ;
LEXICON N_23KIIL1-SG
:%{front%} NMN_23NUUL1/KIIL1-SG ;
LEXICON N_23KIIL1_PL
:%{front%} NMN_23NUUL1/KIIL1_PL ;

LEXICON N_23HIIR1  !!= * @CODE@ hiiŕ:hiir
! Gradation: No
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_23HIIR1-SG ;
 N_23HIIR1_PL ;
LEXICON N_23HIIR1-SG
:%{front%} NMN_23HIIR1-SG ;
LEXICON N_23HIIR1_PL
:%{front%} NMN_23HIIR1_PL ;

LEXICON N_24KAESI !!= * @CODE@ käsi:kä
! gradation: yes
! vowel_harmony: front
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_24KAESI-SG ;
 N_24KAESI_PL ;
LEXICON N_24KAESI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_24XX/KAESI-SG ;
LEXICON N_24KAESI_PL
:%{front%} NMN_24XX/KAESI_PL ;

LEXICON N_24SUSI !!= * @CODE@ susi:su
! gradation: yes
! vowel_harmony: front
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_24SUSI-SG ;
 N_24SUSI_PL ;
LEXICON N_24SUSI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_24SUSI/XX-SG ;
LEXICON N_24SUSI_PL
:%{back%} NMN_24SUSI/XX_PL ;

LEXICON N_25ASW !asõ:asõ
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_25ASW-SG ;
        N_25ASW_PL ;
LEXICON N_25ASW-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_25ASW/SUEAE-SG ;
LEXICON N_25ASW_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_25ASW/SUEAE_PL ;

LEXICON N_25SUEAE
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_25SUEAE-SG ;
        N_25SUEAE_PL ;
LEXICON N_25SUEAE-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_25ASW/SUEAE-SG ;
LEXICON N_25SUEAE_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_25ASW/SUEAE_PL ;

LEXICON N_25ASWQ !asõq:asõ
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_25ASWQ-SG ;
        N_25ASWQ_PL ;
LEXICON N_25ASWQ-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_25ASWQ-SG ;
LEXICON N_25ASWQ_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_25ASWQ_PL ;

!LEXICON N_26HEPEM1
!:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
! N_26HEPEM1-SG ;
! N_26HEPEM1_PL ;

!LEXICON N_26HEPEM1-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_26HEPEM1-SG ;
!LEXICON N_26HEPEM1_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_26HEPEM1_PL ;
!+N+Sg+Nom+WORK: K ;

LEXICON N_27ASTWQ
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_27ASTWQ-SG ;
 N_27ASTWQ_PL ;
LEXICON N_27ASTWQ-SG
:%{back%} NMN_27ASTWQ/EHEQ-SG ;
LEXICON N_27ASTWQ_PL
:%{back%} NMN_27ASTWQ/EHEQ_PL ;

LEXICON N_27EHEQ
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_27EHEQ-SG ;
 N_27EHEQ_PL ;
LEXICON N_27EHEQ-SG
:%{front%} NMN_27ASTWQ/EHEQ-SG ;
LEXICON N_27EHEQ_PL
:%{front%} NMN_27ASTWQ/EHEQ_PL ;

!LEXICON N_27HAPU !!= * __@CODE@__ hapu:hapu
!! gradation: yes
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
! N_27HAPU-SG ;
! N_27HAPU_PL ;

!LEXICON N_27HAPU-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_27HAPU-SG ;
!LEXICON N_27HAPU_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_27HAPU_PL ;

LEXICON N_27KUEMMEND !!= * **@CODE@** kümmend:küm
:%{front%} NMN_27KUEMMEND ;

LEXICON N_28TUETAER1 !!= * **@CODE@** tütäŕ:tütär
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_28TUETAER1-SG ;
 N_28TUETAER1_PL ;
LEXICON N_28TUETAER1-SG
:%{front%} NMN_28TUETAER1-SG ;
LEXICON N_28TUETAER1_PL
:%{front%} NMN_28TUETAER1_PL ;

LEXICON N_28PINNAER1 !!= * **@CODE@** pinnäŕ:pin%{dn%}är
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_28PINNAER1-SG ;
 N_28PINNAER1_PL ;
LEXICON N_28PINNAER1-SG
:%{front%} NMN_28PINNAER1-SG ;
LEXICON N_28PINNAER1_PL
:%{front%} NMN_28PINNAER1_PL ;

LEXICON N_28PAPWR1 !!= * **@CODE@** papõŕ:papõr
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_28PAPWR1-SG ;
 N_28PAPWR1_PL ;
LEXICON N_28PAPWR1-SG
:%{back%} NMN_28PAPWR1-SG ;
LEXICON N_28PAPWR1_PL
:%{back%} NMN_28PAPWR1_PL ;

LEXICON N_28KANNWL1 !!= * **@CODE@** kannõĺ:kan%{dn%}õl
:%^Pen%^G1%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^Pen%^G1%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_28KANNWL1-SG ;
 N_28KANNWL1_PL ;
LEXICON N_28KANNWL1-SG
:%{back%} NMN_28KANNWL1/KINNER1-SG ;
LEXICON N_28KANNWL1_PL
:%{back%} NMN_28KANNWL1/KINNER1_PL ;

LEXICON N_28KINNER1 !!= * **@CODE@** kinneŕ:kin%{dn%}er
:%^Pen%^G1%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^Pen%^G1%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_28KINNER1-SG ;
 N_28KINNER1_PL ;
LEXICON N_28KINNER1-SG
:%{front%} NMN_28KANNWL1/KINNER1-SG ;
LEXICON N_28KINNER1_PL
:%{front%} NMN_28KANNWL1/KINNER1_PL ;

LEXICON N_28SWSAR1 !!= * **@CODE@** sõsaŕ:sõsar
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_28SWSAR1-SG ;
 N_28SWSAR1_PL ;
LEXICON N_28SWSAR1-SG
:%{back%} NMN_28SWSAR1-SG ;
LEXICON N_28SWSAR1_PL
:%{back%} NMN_28SWSAR1_PL ;

LEXICON N_28PUNDAR !!= * **@CODE@** pundar:pun%{td%}ar
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_28PUNDAR-SG ;
 N_28PUNDAR_PL ;
LEXICON N_28PUNDAR-SG
:%{back%} NMN_28PUNDAR/KAEMMAEL-SG ;
LEXICON N_28PUNDAR_PL
:%{back%} NMN_28PUNDAR/KAEMMAEL_PL ;

LEXICON N_28KAEMMAEL !!= * **@CODE@** kämmäl:käm%{bm%}äl
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_28KAEMMAEL-SG ;
 N_28KAEMMAEL_PL ;
LEXICON N_28KAEMMAEL-SG
:%{front%} NMN_28PUNDAR/KAEMMAEL-SG ;
LEXICON N_28KAEMMAEL_PL
:%{front%} NMN_28PUNDAR/KAEMMAEL_PL ;

LEXICON N_29KUU !!= * @CODE@ kuu:kuu
! Gradation: No
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_29KUU-SG ;
 N_29KUU_PL ;
LEXICON N_29KUU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_29KUU/HAEAE-SG ;
LEXICON N_29KUU_PL
:%{back%} NMN_29KUU/HAEAE_PL ;

LEXICON N_29HAEAE !!= * @CODE@ pää:pää
! Gradation: No
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_29HAEAE-SG ;
 N_29HAEAE_PL ;
LEXICON N_29HAEAE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_29KUU/HAEAE-SG ;
LEXICON N_29HAEAE_PL
:%{front%} NMN_29KUU/HAEAE_PL ;


LEXICON N_30MAA
! Gradation: No
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_30MAA-SG ;
 N_30MAA_PL ;
LEXICON N_30MAA-SG
:%{back%} NMN_30MAA/TUEUE-SG ;
LEXICON N_30MAA_PL
:%{back%} NMN_30MAA/TUEUE_PL ;

LEXICON N_30TUEUE
! Gradation: No
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_30TUEUE-SG ;
 N_30TUEUE_PL ;
LEXICON N_30TUEUE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_30MAA/TUEUE-SG ;
LEXICON N_30TUEUE_PL
:%{front%} NMN_30MAA/TUEUE_PL ;

LEXICON N_31TAEI
! Gradation: No
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_31TAEI-SG ;
 N_31TAEI_PL ;
LEXICON N_31TAEI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_31TAEI-SG ;
LEXICON N_31TAEI_PL
:%{front%} NMN_31TAEI_PL ;

LEXICON N_31MAI
! Gradation: No
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_31MAI-SG ;
 N_31MAI_PL ;
LEXICON N_31MAI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_31MAI-SG ;
LEXICON N_31MAI_PL
:%{back%} NMN_31MAI_PL ;

LEXICON N_32VERI !!veri:ve%{rØ%}r
:%^G1%>i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_32VERI-SG ;
 N_32VERI_PL ;
LEXICON N_32VERI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_32VERI-SG ;
LEXICON N_32VERI_PL
:%{front%} NMN_32VERI_PL ;

LEXICON N_33IGAE !!igä:i%{kØ%}%{kgØ%}ä
:%^G2 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_33IGAE-SG ;
 N_33IGAE_PL ;
LEXICON N_33IGAE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_33XX/IGAE-SG ;
LEXICON N_33IGAE_PL
:%{front%} NMN_33XX/IGAE_PL ;

LEXICON N_33JWGI !!jõgi:jõ%{kØ%}%{kgØ%}
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 33
! gradation: yes
:%^G2i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_33JWGI-SG ;
 N_33JWGI_PL ;
LEXICON N_33JWGI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_33JWGI/MAEGI-SG ;
LEXICON N_33JWGI_PL
:%{back%} NMN_33JWGI/MAEGI_PL ;

LEXICON N_33MAEGI !!mägi:mä%{kØ%}%{kgØ%}
! gradation: yes
:%^G2i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_33MAEGI-SG ;
 N_33MAEGI_PL ;
LEXICON N_33MAEGI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_33JWGI/MAEGI-SG ;
LEXICON N_33MAEGI_PL
:%{front%} NMN_33JWGI/MAEGI_PL ;
