src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
mehekene+N:meheke N_22VAEHAEKENE "_#se, #ist__meheke|ne_" ;
tikandiirikene+N:tikandiirike N_22VAEHAEKENE "_#se, #ist__tikandiirike|ne_" ;
veit́kene+N:%{ˋØ%}#veit́ke N_22VAEHAEKENE "_#se, #ist__ˋveit́ke|ne_" ;
hiiŕ+N:hii%{rŕ%} N_23HIIR1 "_hiire, hiirt__hiiŕ_" ;
kaalasuuń+N:kaalas%{ou%}%{ou%}%{nń%} N_23NUUL1 "_#soonõ, #su̬u̬nt__kaala|su̬u̬ń_" ;
kiireq+N:kii%{rŕ%} N_23HIIR1_PL "_ˋkiiri, %{ˋØ%}kiiri__kiireq_" ;
kõosiiń+N:kõos%{ei%}%{ei%}%{nń%} N_23KIIL1 "_#seene, #si̬i̬nt__kõo|si̬i̬ń_" ;
mustaveresuuń+N:mustaveres%{ou%}%{ou%}%{nń%} N_23NUUL1 "_#soonõ, #su̬u̬nt__mustavere|su̬u̬ń_" ;
nahkhiiŕ+N:nahkhii%{rŕ%} N_23HIIR1 "_#hiire, #hiirt__nahk|hiiŕ_" ;
palosiiń+N:palos%{ei%}%{ei%}%{nń%} N_23KIIL1 "_#seene, #si̬i̬nt__palo|si̬i̬n_" ;
saaŕ+N:saa%{rŕ%} N_23SUUR1 "_saarõ, saart__saaŕ_" ;
tuuĺ+N:tuu%{lĺ%} N_23SUUR1 "_tuulõ, tuult__tuuĺ_" ;
tõnõpuuĺ+N:tõ̭nõ#p%{ou%}%{ou%}%{lĺ%} N_23NUUL1 "_tõsõpoolõ, tõistpu̬u̬lt__tõ̭nõpu̬u̬ĺ_" ;
tõõsõqpoolõq+N:tõõsõqp%{ou%}%{ou%}%{lĺ%} N_23NUUL1_PL "_ˋtõisipu̬u̬li, %{ˋØ%}tõisipu̬u̬li__tõõsõqpoolõq_" ;
viiŕ+N:v%{ei%}%{ei%}%{rŕ%} N_23KIIL1 "_veere, vi̬i̬rt__vi̬i̬ŕ_" ;
vikat́kaaŕ+N:vikat́kaa%{rŕ%} N_23SUUR1 "_#kaarõ, #kaart__vikat́|kaaŕ_" ;
ilvessusi+N:ilvessu N_24SUSI "_#soe, #sutt__ilves|susi_" ;
mesi+N:me N_24KAESI "_mi̬i̬, mett__mesi_" ;
susi+N:su N_24SUSI "_soe, sutt__susi_" ;
suulvesi+N:su̬u̬lve N_24KAESI "_#vi̬i̬, #vett__su̬u̬l|vesi_" ;
vesi+N:ve N_24KAESI "_vi̬i̬, vett__vesi_" ;
eloasõq+N:eloasõ N_25ASWQ "_#mõ, #nd__eloasõ|q_" ;
kubõq+N:kubõ N_25ASWQ "_#mõ, #nd __kubõ|q_" ;
varõmõq+N:varõ N_25ASWQ_PL "_#idõ, #it__varõm|õq_" ;
murtusüä+N:%{ˋØ%}#murtusüä N_25SUEAE "_#%{ˋØ%}süäme, #süänd__ˋmurtu|süä_" ;
süä+N:süä N_25SUEAE "_ˋsüäme, süänd__süä_" ;
asõ+N:asõ N_25ASWQ "_#mõ #ma, #nd__asõ|q_" ;
astõq+N:astõ%{qmn%} N_27ASTWQ "_ˋastmõ, astõnd__astõq_" ;
eheq+N:eh%{t́Ø%}e%{qmn%} N_27EHEQ "_ˋeht́me, ehend__eheq_" ;
kainal+N:kain%{dØ%}al N_28PUNDAR "_ˋkaindla, kainald__kainal_" ;
pundar+N:pun%{td%}ar N_28PUNDAR "_ˋpuntra, pundard__pundar_" ;
kämmäl+N:käm%{bm%}äl N_28KAEMMAEL "_ˋkämblä, kämmäld__kämmäl_" ;
kammõŕ+N:kam%{bm%}õ%{rŕ%} N_28KANNWL1 "_ˋkambrõ %{ˋØ%}kambri, kammõrd__kammõŕ_" ;
kannõĺ+N:kan%{dn%}õ%{lĺ%} N_28KANNWL1 "_ˋkandlõ, kannõld__kannõĺ_" ;
kinneŕ+N:kin%{dn%}e%{rŕ%} N_28KINNER1 "_ˋkindre, kinnerd__kinneŕ_" ;
kuningatütäŕ+N:kuninga#tütä%{rŕ%} N_28TUETAER1 "_#%{ˋØ%}tütre, #tütärd__kuninga|tütäŕ_" ;
pannõĺ+N:pan%{dn%}õ%{lĺ%} N_28KANNWL1 "_ˋpandlõ, pannõld__pannõĺ_" ;
papõŕ+N:papõ%{rŕ%} N_28PAPWR1 "_ˋpaprõ, papõrd__papõŕ_" ;
pinnäŕ+N:pindä%{rŕ%} N_28PINNAER1 "_ˋpindre, pinnärd__pinnäŕ_" ;
pipõŕ+N:pipõ%{rŕ%} N_28PAPWR1 "_ˋpiprõ, pipõrd__pipõŕ_" ;
puuĺtütäŕ+N:pu̬u̬ĺ#tütä%{rŕ%} N_28TUETAER1 "_#%{ˋØ%}tütre, #tütärd__pu̬u̬ĺ|tütäŕ_" ;
puuĺsõsaŕ+N:pu̬u̬ĺsõ̭sa%{rŕ%} N_28SWSAR1 "_#ra #rõ, #rd__pu̬u̬ĺsõ̭sa|ŕ_" ;
sõkõĺ+N:sõkõ%{lĺ%} N_28PAPWR1 "_ˋsõklõ, sõkõld__sõkõĺ_" ;
sõsaŕ+N:sõ̭sa%{rŕ%} N_28SWSAR1 "_#ra #rõ, #rd__sõ̭sa|ŕ_" ;
tütäŕ+N:tütä%{rŕ%} N_28TUETAER1 "_ˋtütre, tütärd__tütäŕ_" ;
kääŕpuuq+N:kääŕ#puu N_29KUU_PL "_#puiõ, #puid__kääŕ|puuq_" ;
luu+N:luu N_29KUU "_#, #d__luu_" ;
oripuu+N:oripuu N_29KUU "_#, #d__oripuu_" ;
raudtii+N:raudt%{ei%}%{ei%} N_29HAEAE "_#, #d__raudti̬i̬_" ;
viipspuu+N:viips#puu N_29KUU "_#, #d__viipspuu_" ;
vüü+N:v%{öü%}%{öü%} N_29HAEAE "_#, #d__vü̬ü̬_" ;
käsitüü+N:käsit%{öü%}%{öü%} N_30TUEUE "_#, #d__käsitü̬ü̬_" ;
puu+N:p%{ou%}%{ou%} N_30MAA "_#, #d__pu̬u̬_" ;
pää+N:pää N_30TUEUE "_#, #d, %{ˋØ%}päähä pähäq__pää_" ;
vuu+N:v%{ou%}%{ou%} N_30MAA "_#, #d__vu̬u̬_" ;
koi+N:koi N_31MAI "_#, #d__koi_" ;
papagoi+N:papagoi N_31MAI "_#, #d,__papagoi_" ;
säü+N:säü N_31TAEI "_#, #d__säü_" ;
ijätsäi+N:ijä#tsäi N_31TAEI "_#, #d__tsäi_" ;
ilmameri+N:ilma#me%{rØ%}r N_32VERI "_#e, #d, #ri__ilmamer|i_" ;
suuŕmeri+N:suuŕ#me%{rØ%}r N_32VERI "_#e, #d, #ri__suuŕmer|i_" ;
lägä+N:lä%{kØ%}%{kgØ%}ä N_33IGAE "_#ä, #kä__lä|gä_" ;
müürmägi+N:müürmäg N_33MAEGI "_#e, #ke__müürmä|gi_" ;
nõgi+N:nõg N_33JWGI "_nõ̭õ̭, nõkõ__nõgi_" ;
rasõhusvägi+N:rasõhusväg N_33MAEGI "_#e, #ke__rasõhusvä|gi_" ;
rügä+N:rü%{kØ%}%{kgØ%}ä N_33IGAE "_#ä, #kä__rü|gä_" ;
tõbi+N:tõb N_33JWGI "_#võ, #põ__tõ|bi_" ;
